test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-tulla_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - tulla: # Verb 'to come / tulla' - full paradigm
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tulen
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tulet
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tulou
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tulemmo
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tuletto
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tullah
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tule
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3: tulla

     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tulin
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tulit
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tuli
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tulimmo
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tulitto
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tuldih
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: tulluh
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3: tuldu
     
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg1: tulizin
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg2: tulizit
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg3: [tulis, tuliz]
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl1: tulizimmo
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl2: tulizitto
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl3: tuldas

     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg1: tulluzin
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg2: tulluzit
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg3: [tullus, tulluz]
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl1: tulluzimmo
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl2: tulluzitto
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl3: tuldannus

     tulla+V+Act+PrfPrc: tulluh
     tulla+V+Pss+PrfPrc: tuldu
          
